Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-2418
Department; duties.

The department shall (1) administer the animal feeding operation permitting program in accordance with the National Pollutant Discharge Elimination System of the federal Clean Water Act, 33 U.S.C. 1251 et seq., through the Environmental Protection Act, the Livestock Waste Management Act, and the rules and regulations adopted and promulgated pursuant to such acts and (2) administer the state program for construction and operating permits and major modification approval for animal feeding operations and livestock waste control facilities provided under the Environmental Protection Act, the Livestock Waste Management Act, and the rules and regulations adopted and promulgated pursuant to such acts.

Laws 2004, LB 916, § 7;

Laws 2006, LB 975, § 3.

Environmental Protection Act, see section 81-1532.